Maryland, session 2026, SB0212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0212*

SENATE BILL 212
Article – Education
15–106.12.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “STATE OR LOCAL PUBLIC SAFETY EMPLOYEE” HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN § 18–601 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING THE STATE OR COUNTY IN WHICH THE SPOUSE OR
THE CHILD RESIDES, A SPOUSE OR A FINANCIALLY DEPENDENT CHILD OF A STATE
OR LOCAL PUBLIC SAFETY EMPLOYEE WHO DIES AS A RESULT OF OR IN THE COURSE
OF PERFORMANCE OF DUTIES IS EXEMPT FROM PAYING OUT–OF–STATE OR
OUT–OF–COUNTY TUITION AT A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE
STATE.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
18–601.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) “State or local public safety employee” means a person who is employed
in the State as:
(i) A career or volunteer member of a:
1. Fire department;
2. Ambulance company or squad; or
3. Rescue company or squad;
(ii) A law enforcement officer;
(iii) A correctional officer; or
(iv) A member of the Maryland National Guard who was a resident
of this State at the time of death.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.